Florida, session 2026, SB1490.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 914.18, Florida Statutes, is created to 15 read: 16 914.18âRequired notice of intent to contact victim.â 17 (1)âBefore any attorney, investigator, or other agent 18 acting on behalf of a criminal defendant may contact a victim 19 for the purpose of obtaining information relating to a pending 20 criminal proceeding, he or she must file a notice of intent to 21 contact the victim within 72 hours before making, or attempting 22 to make, such contact. This subsection does not apply to contact 23 with a victim which occurs during a court proceeding or 24 deposition. 25 (2)âThe notice required under subsection (1) must be filed 26 on a standard form developed and made available by the state 27 attorney in each judicial circuit. 28 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.